District of Columbia statutes.
38-2807

District of Columbia public school funding.

The District of Columbia Public Schools should fully fund pre-kindergarten, full-day kindergarten, school counselors, and librarians.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1108, 45 DCR 7193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-157.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter see notes to § 38-2801.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 38-2801.